apertium-pl-uk.pl.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__stuletni">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ego</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ego</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ch</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mi</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ego</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ch</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mi</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ego</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emu</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ego</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ch</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ch</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mi</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ej</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ej</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ą</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ą</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ej</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ch</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mi</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ego</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ch</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mi</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>m</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stuletni__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__stuletni"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="przedni"><i>przedni</i><par n="stuletni__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="poprzedni"><i>poprzedni</i><par n="stuletni__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ostatni"><i>ostatni</i><par n="stuletni__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zachodni"><i>zachodni</i><par n="stuletni__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wschodni"><i>wschodni</i><par n="stuletni__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stuletni"><i>stuletni</i><par n="stuletni__adj"/></e>
